Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. Incorporation

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision relative to incorporation, see art. 13, § 1, Wyo. Const.

For provision requiring the consent of the electors with reference to organization of municipalities, see art. 13, § 2, Wyo. Const.

Statutory procedure and records exclusive. —

If the statute provides the means and procedure by which a town may become incorporated, or by which annexation may be made, that method and procedure is exclusive, and, in the same kind, the records made under that procedure are exclusive of any other binding record. Griffin v. Pine Bluffs, 366 P.2d 993,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 135

(Wyo. 1961), reh'g denied, 368 P.2d 132,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 1962).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d Municipal Corporations §§ 28 to 43.

62 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations § 11.

§ 15-1-201.
Territories which may incorporate.

Any territory, including multiple territories within one (1) mile of each other and which are connected to a common culinary water system, not included in any incorporated city or town and not ineligible for incorporation under the provisions of W.S.

15-1-411

, having a total resident population of not less than two hundred (200) persons and containing within its boundaries an area with a density of at least seventy (70) persons per square mile, may be incorporated as a town in the manner provided in this article. When territories connected to a common culinary water system are incorporated under this act, the pipelines connecting the territories shall be included in the town limits.

For purposes of this article:

“Census” means the census conducted pursuant to W.S. 15-1-202(a);

“Population” means the population as determined by the census conducted pursuant to W.S. 15-1-202(a).

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 21; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-21; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1989, ch. 6, § 1; 1999, ch. 91, § 1; 2005, ch. 138, § 1; 2009, ch. 170, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section to allow territories to incorporate if they are connected to a common culinary water supply.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, designated the existing language as (a) and added (b).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 15-1-101(a)(xv).

Proceeding void where land included in previously incorporatedarea. —

If the election proceeding included lands already within an incorporated area, that election would be in contravention of this section and therefore illegal, invalid and completely null and void. Anderson v. Rees, 393 P.2d 807,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1964).

Section covers all classes of government. —

Cities which have adopted commission form of government do not form an additional class to those authorized by art. 13, § 1, Wyo. Const. and formed under provisions of this article. State ex rel. Diers v. Sheldon, 29 Wyo. 233, 213 P. 92,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1923).

§ 15-1-202.
Survey, map and census; contents; affidavits.

Any person intending to apply for the incorporation of a town shall:

Have prepared an accurate survey and map of the territory intended to be embraced within its limits, which shall be made by a land surveyor registered under the laws of Wyoming and shall show the courses and distances of the boundaries of the territory, the quantity of land embraced and be accompanied by the affidavit of the surveyor. In preparing an accurate survey and map of the territory intended to be embraced within the town limits, a land surveyor registered under the laws of Wyoming may reference or adopt courses and distances of the boundaries of the territory from subdivision plats made by a land surveyor registered under the laws of Wyoming, platted in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

34-12-101

through

34-12-104

;

Not more than forty (40) days prior to the time of presenting the application to the board of county commissioners, cause an accurate census to be taken of the resident population of the territory which shall show the name of every head of a family residing within the territory on the day the census was taken, the number of persons then belonging to every family and be accompanied by the affidavit of the census taker.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 22, 23; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-22, 15.1-23; W.S. 1977, §§

15-1-202

,

15-1-203

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 2005, ch. 139, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to platting and dedicating, see §§

34-12-101

to

34-12-115

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(i), added the last sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Incorporation not invalidated by delay between filing of platand completion of proceedings. —

A delay of 23 years between the dedication and filing of the town plat and the completion of the incorporation proceedings did not invalidate the incorporation. Anderson v. Rees, 393 P.2d 124,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 393 P.2d 807,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1964).

§ 15-1-203.
Survey, map and census; examination; filing; notice.

The survey, map and census, when completed and verified, shall be left at some convenient place within the territory for not less than twenty (20) days for examination by anyone having an interest in the application. A copy of the survey, map and census shall be filed in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the territory is situated. A notice which sets forth the boundaries of the territory, the time of making application and the place where the survey, map and census may be examined shall be posted in three (3) public places in the territory.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-24; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-204

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-204.
Application; contents.

The application for incorporation shall be by petition subscribed by the applicant and not less than a majority of the electors residing within the territory proposed to be incorporated. The petition shall:

Set forth the boundaries and quantity of land according to the survey, the resident population according to the census and the name proposed for the city or town;

Have attached thereto the affidavits of not less than three (3) of the electors verifying the facts alleged;

Be presented to the board of county commissioners of the county in which the territory is located at the time stated in the notice of application, or as soon as possible thereafter;

Be accompanied by a copy of the notice required to be posted and by an affidavit showing compliance with the posting requirements.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-25; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-205

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Constitution not self-executing. —

Article 13, § 2, Wyo. Const., was not self-executing, and did not, without legislation to carry it into effect, by implication repeal the then existing law authorizing incorporation of towns on the application of 30 electors. State ex rel. Vidal v. Lamoureux, 3 Wyo. 731, 30 P. 243,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1892).

§ 15-1-205.
Application; hearing; appointment of election inspectors; duties thereof; style of ballots.

The board of county commissioners shall hear all parties interested in the application who appear and ask to be heard. If the board, after hearing, is satisfied that all the requirements of this article have been complied with and that the territory contains the required population, it shall make an order appointing three (3) inspectors.

The inspectors shall:

Call an election of all qualified electors residing within the territory to be held at some convenient place within its limits. The board of county commissioners shall determine the election date, which may be a date authorized under W.S.

22-21-103

or another date which is not less than thirty (30) days after the entry of the order under subsection (a) of this section;

Provide for a notice of the election which shall:

Be published at least once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks in some newspaper published within the territory, and posted in five (5) places within the territory, with the posting and publication occurring not less than three (3) weeks prior to the election;

If there is no newspaper published within the territory, be posted not less than three (3) weeks prior to the election in eight (8) public places therein;

Specify the place and time of the election; and

Contain a description of the limits of the proposed city or town.

Act as judges and clerks of the election and shall qualify as required by law for judges and clerks at city and town elections;

Report the result of the ballot to the board of county commissioners by filing it with the county clerk.

The ballots used at the election shall state “for incorporation” or “against incorporation”.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 26; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-26; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-206

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1996, ch. 97, § 2.

§ 15-1-206.
Notice of election results; filing thereof; completion date.

If a majority of the ballots cast at the election are in favor of incorporation, the county clerk, immediately after the report has been filed in his office, shall publish the result in a newspaper published within the county, or if there is none, the clerk shall post the result in five (5) public places within the limits of the proposed city or town. A copy of the notice with proof of its publication or posting shall be filed in the office of the county clerk with the other documents relating to the incorporation.

The incorporation is complete when all requirements have been complied with and officers for the city or town have been elected and qualified.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-27; W.S. 1977, §

15-1-207

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-1-207.
Procedure where territory to be incorporated lies within two or more counties.

If the territory to be incorporated lies within two (2) or more counties, the residents thereof may incorporate by following the procedure specified in this article, except that applications, notices, petitions, records and certificates shall be made to or by all counties within whose boundaries the territory to be incorporated lies.

If the territory to be incorporated lies within two (2) or more counties, the board of county commissioners of each county shall appoint one (1) or more of the election inspectors, or the boards of county commissioners meeting together shall appoint the election inspectors.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 28; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-28; W.S. 1977, § 15-1-208; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.